Washington statutes.
RCW 19.290.180

Director of licensing authorized to adopt rules and regulations, set license and renewal fees.

(1) The director of licensing is hereby authorized to adopt reasonable rules and regulations not in conflict with provisions hereof for the proper operation and enforcement of this chapter.

(2) The director shall set all license and renewal fees in accordance with RCW 43.24.086.

[ 2013 c 322 s 20.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Implementation—2013 c 322 ss 12-23: See notes following RCW 19.290.100.